Hawaii statutes.
§424-1 General provisions. A nonprofit
optometric service corporation may be formed for the purposes of contracting
with individuals and corporations, both public and private, for defraying or
assuming the costs of services of optometrists, and the contracting on behalf
of optometrists to furnish such services. The director of commerce and
consumer affairs shall grant to applicants who file articles of incorporation
in conformity with section 414D-32 a charter of incorporation for the
establishment and conduct of an optometric service corporation; provided that
the corporation may not engage directly or indirectly in the performance of the
corporate purposes or objects unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) At least twenty-five per cent of all licensed
optometrists in this State have become members of the corporation;

(2) Membership in the corporation and an opportunity
to render professional services upon a uniform basis are available to all
licensed optometrists in this State;

(3) Voting by proxy and cumulative voting are
prohibited; and

(4) A certificate of compliance with the requirements
of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) has been issued to the corporation by the board
of examiners in optometry.

Any charter granted or corporation created
under authority of this section shall be subject to all general laws enacted in
regard to nonprofit corporations. [L 1965, c 84, §2; Supp, §176E-1; HRS §424-1;
am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1988, c 370, §9; am L 2002, c
40, §62]

Cross References

Optometry license, see chapter 459.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next